apertium-ell.ell.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ΑΒΓΔΕΖΗΘΙΚΛΜΝΞΟΠΡΣΤΥΦΧΨΩαβγδεζηθικλμνξοπρστυφχψωςάέήίόύώΐΰϋϊἱΆΈΉΊΌΎΏΫΪ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="part"   c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"  c="Verb to be"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"  c="Verb to have"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="nom"    c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="Vocative"/>
    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"    c="Defininite"/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine / Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="pst"    c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"    c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="enc"    c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"    c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="pri"    c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="inf"    c="Non-finite"/>
    <sdef n="pii"    c="Past imperfect (continuous)"/>
    <sdef n="aor"    c="Aorist"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="ger"    c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"    c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="sent"   c="Sentence boundary"/>
  </sdefs>
<pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/ένας__num">
      <e><p><l>ένας</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ενός</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>έναν</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ένα</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>ένα</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μία</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μιας</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μία</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ένα</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ενός</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ένα</l><r>ένας<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="δύο__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="τρ/εις__num">
      <e><p><l>εις</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιών</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εις</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εις</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιών</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εις</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ία</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιών</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ία</l><r>εις<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="τ/έσσερις__num">
      <e><p><l>έσσερις</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εσσάρων</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έσσερις</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έσσερις</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εσσάρων</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έσσερις</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έσσερα</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εσσάρων</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έσσερα</l><r>έσσερις<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Particles -->
    <pardef n="θα__part">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="από__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->
    <pardef n="εάν__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="και__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->
    <pardef n="/ένας__det">
      <e><p><l>ένας</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μια</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>μία</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ένα</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ενός</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μιας</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ενός</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ένα</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>έναν</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><a/>ένα</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>μια</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>μια</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>μία</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ένα</l><r>ένας<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="θα"><i>θα</i><par n="θα__part"/></e>
    <e lm="και"><i>και</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="κι"><i>κι</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="αλλά"><i>αλλά</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ή"><i>ή</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="όμως"><i>όμως</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ούτε"><i>ούτε</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="μήτε"><i>μήτε</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ουδέ"><i>ουδέ</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="μηδέ"><i>μηδέ</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="είτε"><i>είτε</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="μα"><i>μα</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ωστόσο"><i>ωστόσο</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ενώ"><i>ενώ</i><par n="και__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="αν και"><i>αν<b/>και</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="παρότι"><i>παρότι</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="επειδή"><i>επειδή</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="εάν"><i>εάν</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="αν"><i>αν</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="γιατί"><i>γιατί</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="πως"><i>πως</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="όταν"><i>όταν</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ότι"><i>ότι</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="να"><i>να</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="πριν να"><i>πριν<b/>να</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ώστε να"><i>ώστε<b/>να</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="για να"><i>για<b/>να</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="καθώς"><i>καθώς</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="όσο που"><i>όσο<b/>που</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="λοιπόν"><i>λοιπόν</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ώστε"><i>ώστε</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="άρα"><i>άρα</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="που"><i>που</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="δηλαδή"><i>δηλαδή</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ενώ"><i>ενώ</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="αφότου"><i>αφότου</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ώσπου"><i>ώσπου</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="όποτε"><i>όποτε</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="αφού"><i>αφού</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="που"><i>που</i><par n="εάν__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ένας"><i/><par n="/ένας__det"/></e>
    <e lm="από"><i>από</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="από" r="LR"><p><l>απ'</l><r>από</r></p><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="γι'" r="LR"><p><l>γι'</l><r>για</r></p><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="για"><i>για</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="δίπλα"><i>δίπλα</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="εις"><i>εις</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="επί"><i>επί</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="εκ"><i>εκ</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="εν"><i>εν</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ενάντια"><i>ενάντια</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="εναντίον"><i>εναντίον</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="με"><i>με</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="μείον"><i>μείον</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="μετά"><i>μετά</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="σαν"><i>σαν</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="σε"><i>σε</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="στο"><i>στο</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="χωρίς"><i>χωρίς</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ως"><i>ως</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="κατά"><i>κατά</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="αντί"><i>αντί</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ίσαμε"><i>ίσαμε</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="δίχως"><i>δίχως</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="μέχρι"><i>μέχρι</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="παρά"><i>παρά</i><par n="από__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ένας"><i></i><par n="/ένας__num"/></e>
    <e lm="δύο"><i>δύο</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="δυο"><p><l>δυο</l><r>δύο</r></p><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="τρεις"><i>τρ</i><par n="τρ/εις__num"/></e>
    <e lm="τέσσερις"><i>τ</i><par n="τ/έσσερις__num"/></e>
    <e lm="πέντε"><i>πέντε</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="έξι"><i>έξι</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="εφτά"><i>εφτά</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="επτά"><p><l>επτά</l><r>εφτά</r></p><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="οχτώ"><i>οχτώ</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="οκτώ"><p><l>οκτώ</l><r>οχτώ</r></p><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="εννέα"><i>εννέα</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="εννιά"><p><l>εννιά</l><r>εννέα</r></p><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="δέκα"><i>δέκα</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ένδεκα"><i>ένδεκα</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ένtεκα"><p><l>ένtεκα</l><r>ένδεκα</r></p><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="δώδεκα"><i>δώδεκα</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e lm="δεκατρεις"><i>δεκατρ</i><par n="τρ/εις__num"/></e>
    <e lm="δεκατέσσερις"><i>δεκατ</i><par n="τ/έσσερις__num"/></e>
    <e lm="δεκαπέντε"><i>δεκαπέντε</i><par n="δύο__num"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
